Maryland, session 2026, HB0033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–218.
(a) Only an individual who itemizes deductions on the individual’s federal income
tax return may elect to itemize deductions on the individual’s income tax return.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, an individual who elects to itemize
deductions is allowed as a deduction the sum of the individual’s federal itemized
deductions:
(1) limited and reduced as required under the Internal Revenue Code;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0033*

HOUSE BILL 33
(2) further reduced by any amount deducted under § 170 of the Internal
Revenue Code for contributions of a preservation or conservation easement for which a
credit is claimed under § 10–723 of this title; and
(3) further reduced by the amount claimed as taxes on income paid to a
state or political subdivision of a state, after subtracting a pro rata portion of the reduction
to itemized deductions required under § 68 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(c) (1) (I) In this subsection[, “applicable] THE FOLLOWING WORDS
HAVE THE MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “APPLICABLE amount” means:
[(i)] 1. $100,000 for a married individual filing separately; and
[(ii)] 2. $200,000 for all other filers.
(III) “ITEMIZED DEDUCTION” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE
DEDUCTION FOR CHARITABLE CONTRIBUTIONS ALLOWED UNDER § 170 OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(2) This subsection does not apply to a fiduciary.
(3) In the case of an individual whose federal adjusted gross income
exceeds the applicable amount, the amount of itemized deductions otherwise allowable for
a taxable year shall be reduced by 7.5% of the excess of the federal adjusted gross income
over the applicable amount.
(4) This subsection shall be applied after the application of any other
limitation on the allowance of any itemized deduction.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.